Utah statutes.
53-2b-403.   Emergency Management Assistance Compact takes precedence.

The provisions of Title 53, Chapter 2a, Part 4, Emergency Management Assistance Compact, supercede the provisions of this chapter for any period of time when a declared state of emergency is in effect, under the Emergency Management Assistance Compact, with respect to a requesting political subdivision.



Enacted by Chapter 331, 2013 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 331, 2013 General Session, (Coordination Clause)

